Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5759.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature makes the following findings:(1) A program that provides affordable financing for the purchase of original works of art by Washington state artists will stimulate the arts, small businesses, Washington artists, the creative economy, and encourage art ownership;(2) The arts contribute significantly to the economic vitality and cultural richness of Washington state;(3) Access to original works of art enhance the quality of life for individuals, artists, businesses, and communities; and(4) Tasmania's art purchase program provides the basis and guide for Washington state's own your own art program. Since 2009, more than 6,700 Tasmanian artworks worth a combined value of $22,000,000 have been purchased through the program.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The purpose of the own your own art purchase program is to provide interest-free loans to eligible individuals for the purchase of original works of art by Washington state artists from participating arts businesses. This will:(1) Support Washington state artists by facilitating the purchase of their artwork and increasing their income and visibility;(2) Stimulate the arts economy by encouraging art buying, which in turn supports participating art businesses including, but not limited to, galleries and studios, and by contributing to the overall economic health of the arts and creative economy sectors in the state;(3) Increase art ownership by making art more accessible through interest-free loans which can encourage individuals to invest in original artwork, enriching their homes and lives while supporting the arts community;(4) Promote arts and culture by making art more accessible to a wider range of people which will increase appreciation for and engagement with the arts within the state; and(5) Create a win-win situation by connecting art buyers with Washington state artists, fostering a thriving arts ecosystem, and enriching the cultural landscape of the state.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.46 RCW to read as follows:(1) The own your own art purchase program is established within the commission. The commission must administer the program and issue loans as provided in this section. To administer the program and issue loans, the commission may solicit gifts and grants under RCW 43.46.060 and expend money appropriated by the legislature for this purpose.(2) To be eligible for a loan under this section, an applicant must:(a) Be a resident of the United States;(b) Be 18 years of age or older;(c) Purchase artwork for personal use;(d) Agree not to export the artwork while the loan is outstanding without written consent from the commission; and(e) Meet other eligibility criteria established by the commission in rule.(3) Eligible purchases include:(a) Original works of art created by Washington state artists;(b) Commissions of original works of art by Washington state artists; and(c) Original works of art created by Washington-based indigenous artists.(4) The own your own art purchase program must provide loans of between $1,000 and $12,000 as provided in this section. Loans shall be interest-free or low-interest. Loans shall be repaid in 12 equal monthly installments. The commission must establish a process for collecting loan payments, including through direct debit. A fee may be charged for late or dishonored payments and additional terms and conditions may be imposed as necessary to administer the program.--- END ---